Maryland, session 2026, SB0207.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
18–303.4.
(a) THIS SECTION APPLIES BEGINNING WITH THE 2029–2030 FINANCIAL
AID AWARD YEAR.
(B) (1) Beginning when financial aid information is available each year, but
not later than October 1 each year, the Office shall compile and certify lists for the entire
State that rank applicants for the Guaranteed Access Grant award by financial need.
(2) Regularly, the Office shall provide to each institution of higher
education in the State the lists compiled and certified in accordance with paragraph (1) of
this subsection.
[(b)] (C) (1) Each institution of higher education shall use the lists provided
by the Office in accordance with subsection [(a)] (B) of this section, and the requirements
under §§ 18–303 and 18–304 of this subtitle, to determine the applicants who shall be
offered a Guaranteed Access Grant award by the institution and the amount of the award.
(2) The institution shall send the financial aid award notification to an
applicant to offer the applicant a Guaranteed Access Grant award.
[(c)] (D) An applicant may accept the offer of a Guaranteed Access Grant award
from an institution of higher education.
– 1 –

Ch. 99 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
[(d)] (E) (1) Each semester, each institution OF HIGHER EDUCATION shall
submit to the Office a list of the students who were awarded a Guaranteed Access Grant
for the semester and the amounts awarded.
(2) The Office shall reimburse each institution for the Guaranteed Access
Grant awards on the list submitted in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection.
[(e)] (F) (1) (i) The Office shall compile and certify lists of students who
previously received a Guaranteed Access Grant award and are eligible for a renewal award.
(ii) The Office shall provide to each institution of higher education
in the State the lists compiled and certified in accordance with subparagraph (i) of this
paragraph.
(2) (i) Each institution of higher education shall use the lists provided
by the Office in accordance with paragraph (1) of this subsection, and the requirements
under §§ 18–303 and 18–304 of this subtitle, to determine the students who shall be offered
a Guaranteed Access Grant renewal award by the institution.
(ii) The institution shall send the financial aid award notification to
a student to offer the student a Guaranteed Access Grant renewal award.
(3) The Office shall reimburse each institution OF HIGHER EDUCATION
for the Guaranteed Access Grant renewal awards made in accordance with paragraph (1)
of this subsection.
[(f)] (G) The Office shall adopt regulations to implement this section.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, April 14, 2026.
– 2 –